District of Columbia statutes.
3-1314

Operation of daily numbers games.

The Board shall operate and conduct a daily numbers game. The proceeds of the sale of tickets shall be deposited in the Fund from which prizes shall be paid in the manner specified in § 3-1312. The Board shall authorize daily numbers games sales agents to distribute monies from the Fund to holders of winning tickets pursuant to regulations established by the Board. The Board may provide by regulation for the payment of prizes to winners directly by licensed agents.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736

Section References

This section is referenced in § 3-1316.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2514.